aspell/se_affix.dat
SFX Q Y 99
SFX Q   t               šgoahtima                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtime                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtimen                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtimin                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtimis                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtinvearan              t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtinveara               t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtin                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtibeahtti              t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtiba                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtit                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtibehtet               t
SFX Q   t               šgoahttet                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtti                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoahttot                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoahttu                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtá                     t
SFX Q   t               šgoahtán                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoađekeahtes               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiin               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineame           t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineatte          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineaskka         t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineamet          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineattet         t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiineaset          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiinan             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiinat             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedettiinis             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađediin                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoađedin                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađe                      t
SFX Q   t               šgoađehaga                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoađekeahttá               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađikeahtes               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiin               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineame           t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineatte          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineaskka         t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineamet          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineattet         t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiineaset          t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiinan             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiinat             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidettiinis             t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidiin                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoađidin                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađihaga                  t
SFX Q   t               šgoađikeahttá               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađi                      t
SFX Q   t               šgoađále                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáleimme                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáleidde                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáleigga                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáleimmet               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáleiddet               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáledje                 t
SFX Q   t               šgoađálin                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađálit                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađálii                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađáše                    t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášeimme                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášeidde                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášeigga                t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášeimmet               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášeiddet               t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášedje                 t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášin                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášit                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađášii                   t
SFX Q   t               šgoađán                     t
SFX Q   t               šgoađát                     t
SFX Q   t               šgoađážit                   t
SFX Q   t               šgohtet                     t
SFX Q   t               šgohte                      t
SFX Q   t               šgohten                     t
SFX Q   t               šgohto                      t
SFX Q   t               šgohtoska                   t
SFX Q   t               šgohtot                     t
SFX Q   t               šgohtoset                   t
SFX Q   t               šgohton                     t
SFX Q   t               šgohtos                     t
SFX Q   t               šgođeš                      t
SFX Q   t               šgođeže                     t
SFX Q   t               šgođežedne                  t
SFX Q   t               šgođežetne                  t
SFX Q   t               šgođežeahppi                t
SFX Q   t               šgođežeaba                  t
SFX Q   t               šgođežit                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođežehpet                 t
SFX Q   t               šgođežan                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođežat                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođeža                     t
SFX Q   t               šgođiime                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođiide                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođiiga                    t
SFX Q   t               šgođiimet                   t
SFX Q   t               šgođiidet                   t
SFX Q   t               šgođii                      t
